Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.315

Civil penalty for failure to comply with chapter.

Every person who fails to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted under it may be subjected to a civil penalty, as determined by the director, in an amount of not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars for every such violation. Each and every such violation shall be a separate and distinct offense. Every person who, through an act of commission or omission, procures, aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered to have violated this section and may be subject to the civil penalty herein provided.

[ 1989 c 380 s 61; 1985 c 158 s 3.]